Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 4. Offenses Relating to Judicial and Other Proceedings.

Collateral references. —

58 Am. Jur. 2d, Obstructing Justice, § 1 et seq.

67 C.J.S., Obstructing Justice, §§ 1-22.

Sec. 11.56.510.
Interference with official proceedings.

A person commits the crime of interference with official proceedings if the person

uses force on anyone, damages the property of anyone, or threatens anyone with intent to

improperly influence a witness or otherwise influence the testimony of a witness;

influence a juror’s vote, opinion, decision, or other action as a juror;

retaliate against a witness or juror because of participation by the witness or juror in an official proceeding; or

otherwise affect the outcome of an official proceeding; or

confers, offers to confer, or agrees to confer a benefit

upon a witness with intent to improperly influence that witness; or

upon a juror with intent to influence the juror’s vote, opinion, decision, or other action as a juror or otherwise affect the outcome of an official proceeding.

Interference with official proceedings is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “force,” “property,” “threat,” “official proceeding,” “benefit” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “improperly influence a witness,” “juror,” “witness” — AS

11.56.900

Assault in the first, second, third, and fourth degree — AS

11.41.200

—

11.41.230

Criminal mischief — AS

11.46.480

—

11.46.486

Bribery — AS

11.56.100

Perjury — AS

11.56.200

Receiving a bribe by witness or juror — AS

11.56.520

Tampering with a witness — AS

11.56.540

Jury tampering — AS

11.56.590

Misconduct by a juror — AS

11.56.600

Original Code Provision — AS 11.30.320; AS 11.30.010.

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.520.
Receiving a bribe by a witness or juror.

A person commits the crime of receiving a bribe by a witness or juror if the person solicits a benefit with the intent that, or accepts or agrees to accept a benefit upon an agreement or understanding that,

the person will be improperly influenced as a witness; or

the person’s vote, decision, opinion, or other action as a juror will be influenced.

Receiving a bribe by a witness or juror is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “solicits,” “benefit” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “witness,” “juror,” “improperly influence a witness” — AS

11.56.900

Interference with official proceedings — AS

11.56.510

Misconduct by a juror — AS

11.56.600

Original Code Provision — AS 11.30.320

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.540.
Tampering with a witness in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of tampering with a witness in the first degree if the person knowingly induces or attempts to induce a witness to

testify falsely, offer misleading testimony, or unlawfully withhold testimony in an official proceeding; or

be absent from a judicial proceeding to which the witness has been summoned.

Tampering with a witness in the first degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 122 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.545.
Tampering with a witness in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of tampering with a witness in the second degree if the person knowingly induces or attempts to induce a witness to be absent from an official proceeding, other than a judicial proceeding, to which the witness has been summoned.

Tampering with a witness in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 122 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

Definition of “official proceeding” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “knowingly” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “witness” — AS

11.56.900

Interference with official proceedings — AS

11.56.510

Receiving a bribe by a witness or juror — AS

11.56.520

Original Code Provision — AS 11.30.320

TD: IV, 59-60.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Collateral references. —

Construction and application of federal witness tampering statute,
18 U.S.C.A. § 1512(b).
185 ALR Fed. 1.

Sec. 11.56.590.
Jury tampering.

A person commits the crime of jury tampering if the person directly or indirectly communicates with a juror other than as permitted by the rules governing the official proceeding with intent to

influence the juror’s vote, opinion, decision, or other action as a juror; or

otherwise affect the outcome of the official proceeding.

Jury tampering is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “official proceeding” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “juror” — AS

11.56.900

Interference with official proceedings — AS

11.56.510

Receiving a bribe by a witness or juror — AS

11.56.520

Misconduct by a juror — AS

11.56.600

Original Code Provision — AS 11.30.320

TD: IV, 63.

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.600.
Misconduct by a juror.

A person commits the crime of misconduct by a juror if, being a juror, the person promises or agrees, before the submission of any part of an official proceeding to a jury for deliberation, to vote for or agree to a verdict for or against a party in the official proceeding, or otherwise to affect the outcome of the official proceeding.

Misconduct by a juror is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “official proceeding” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “juror” — AS

11.56.900

(3)

Interference with official proceedings — AS

11.56.510

Receiving a bribe by a witness or juror — AS

11.56.520

Jury tampering — AS

11.56.590

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.610.
Tampering with physical evidence.

A person commits the crime of tampering with physical evidence if the person

destroys, mutilates, alters, suppresses, conceals, or removes physical evidence with intent to impair its verity or availability in an official proceeding or a criminal investigation;

makes, presents, or uses physical evidence, knowing it to be false, with intent to mislead a juror who is engaged in an official proceeding or a public servant who is engaged in an official proceeding or a criminal investigation;

prevents the production of physical evidence in an official proceeding or a criminal investigation by the use of force, threat, or deception against anyone; or

does any act described by (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection with intent to prevent the institution of an official proceeding.

Tampering with physical evidence is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “physical evidence,” “juror” — AS

11.56.900

Definition of “official proceeding,” “public servant,” “force,” “threat,” “deception” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Assault in the first, second, third, and fourth degree — AS

11.41.200

—

11.41.230

Tampering with public records — AS

11.56.820

Original Code Provision — AS 11.30.290; AS 11.30.300; AS 11.30.315

TD: IV, 64-65.

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Where an operator of a motor vehicle which was involved in an accident fails to render assistance to an injured person, an act which is punishable as a felony under AS

28.35.060(c)

, and Alaska state troopers investigate the incident and during the course of the investigation an attorney contacts the troopers, stating that a client has informed him that the client has committed the act and wishes to make restitution to the victim for medical expenses and requests the troopers’ assistance in making the payment, but refuses to disclose to the troopers the name of his client, such refusal to divulge the client’s identity is neither illegal nor unethical. November 27, 1979, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 11.56.620.
Simulating legal process.

A person commits the crime of simulating legal process if, with intent to cause the recipient to take an action on it, the person issues, sends, or delivers

a request for payment of money on behalf of any creditor that in form and substance simulates any legal process issued by a court of this state; or

any purported summons, subpoena, or other legal process knowing that the process was not issued or authorized by a court or other official body authorized by law to do so.

Simulating legal process is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Theft by deception — AS

11.46.180

Scheme to defraud — AS

11.46.600

TD: IV, 66-67.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see
AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment, and
AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provisions relating to unlawful practice of law in the state, see AS

08.08.210

–

08.08.230

.